Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.108

Salaries of mayor and commissioners.

The annual salaries of the mayor and the commissioners of any city operating under a commission form of government shall be as fixed by charter or ordinance of said city. The power and authority conferred by this section shall be construed as in addition and supplemental to powers or authority conferred by any other law, and nothing contained herein shall be construed as limiting any other powers or authority of any such city.

[ 1967 c 100 s 1.]